Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Chapter 77. Community Property Act.
Sec. 34.77.155.
Division of community property at death.

Upon the death of a spouse, one-half of the aggregate value of the community property owned by the spouses and by any community property trust established by the spouses reflects the share of the surviving spouse and the other one-half reflects the share of the decedent.

Upon the death of a spouse, the deceased spouse’s personal representative and the trustee of a community property trust each have the power to distribute community property in divided or undivided interests and to adjust resulting differences in valuation. A distribution of community property in kind may be made on the basis of a non pro rata division of the aggregate value of the community property, on the basis of a pro rata division of each individual item or asset of community property, or by using both methods.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, spouses may agree in writing to divide their community property on the basis of a non pro rata division of the aggregate value of the community property or on the basis of a pro rata division of each individual item or asset of community property, or by using both methods.

History.

(§ 5 ch 80 SLA 2001)

Sec. 34.77.160.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose and to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

History.

(§ 11 ch 42 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 34.75.160. Renumbered in 1998.

Sec. 34.77.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“acquire” in relation to property includes obtaining reductions of indebtedness on encumbered property and obtaining a lien on or a security interest in property;

“appreciation” means a realized or unrealized increase in the value of property;

“community property” means property owned jointly by both spouses under a community property agreement or a community property trust;

“community property agreement” means an agreement that complies with AS

34.77.090

;

“community property trust” means an express trust that complies with AS

34.77.100

;

“decree” means a judgment or other order of a court;

“determination date” means the later of

marriage;

the effective date of a community property agreement or a community property trust; or

May 23, 1998;

“disposition at death” means the transfer of property by will, intestate succession, nontestamentary transfer, or other means that take effect at the transferor’s death;

“dissolution” means

termination of a marriage by a decree of dissolution, divorce, annulment, or declaration of invalidity; or

entry of a decree of legal separation or separate maintenance;

“during marriage” means a period that begins at marriage and ends at divorce, dissolution, or the death of a spouse;

“held” means the registration, recordation, or filing by a person in a public office in the name of the person of a document of title to property, or the issuance in the person’s name of a writing that customarily operates as a document of title to the property;

“income” means dividends, interest, and net rents and other net returns attributable to investment, rental, licensing, or other use of property unless attributable to a return of capital or to appreciation;

“management and control” means the right to buy, sell, use, transfer, exchange, abandon, lease, consume, expend, assign, create a security interest in, mortgage, encumber, dispose of, institute or defend a civil action regarding, or otherwise deal with property as if the property is the property of an unmarried person;

“notice” of a fact means a knowledge of it, receipt of a notification of it, or reason to know that it exists from the facts and circumstances known to the person;

“presume” or a “presumption” means the imposition on the person against whom the presumption or presumed fact is directed of the burden of proving that the nonexistence of the presumed fact is more probable than its existence;

“property” means an interest, present or future, legal or equitable, vested or contingent, in real or personal property;

“written waiver” means a document signed by a person against whose interests it is sought to be enforced.

History.

(§ 11 ch 42 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 34.75.900. Renumbered in 1998, at which time references to “AS

34.77.090

” and “AS

34.77.100

” in paragraphs (4) and (5), respectively, were substituted for “AS

34.75.090

” and “AS 34.75.100”, respectively, to reflect the 1998 renumbering of those sections.

Editor’s notes. —

With respect to paragraph (15), § 12, ch. 42, SLA 1998 provides the following: “COURT RULE. AS

34.77.900

(15), enacted by sec. 11 of this Act, changes Rule 301, Alaska Rules of Evidence, by changing the effect of presumptions established under AS 34.77.”

Sec. 34.77.995.
Short Title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Community Property Act.

History.

(§ 11 ch 42 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 34.75.995. Renumbered in 1998.